Missouri, session 2026, SB1133.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 130.176, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 130.176,
to read as follows:
130.176. 1. Upon a committee's receipt of a
contribution of more than two thousand dollars, the
treasurer shall obtain from the donor an affirmation that
the donor is not a foreign national and has not knowingly or
willfully accepted funds, directly or indirectly,
aggregating in excess of ten thousand dollars from one or
more prohibited sources within the two-year period
immediately preceding the date the contribution is made, in
the case of an individual, or within the four-year period
immediately preceding the date the contribution is made, in
case of any other entity. Receipt of an affirmation by a
committee pursuant to this subsection shall create a
rebuttable presumption of compliance with this subsection on
the part of the committee. Nothing in this subsection shall
prohibit the attorney general from pursuing any action
pursuant to section 130.188 if the attorney general has
found a willful violation of this subsection.

SB 1133 2
2. Each disclosure report filed pursuant to section
130.041 shall require the treasurer of a committee to affirm
that the donor associated with each contribution is not a
foreign national and has not knowingly or willfully
received, solicited, or accepted, whether directly or
indirectly, contributions from one or more prohibited
sources aggregating in excess of ten thousand dollars within
the two-year period immediately preceding the date of the
contribution, in the case of an individual, or within the
four-year period immediately preceding the date of the
contribution, in the case of any other entity.
3. Within forty-eight hours of making one or more
expenditures supporting or opposing a ballot measure, the
entity making the expenditure shall affirm to the Missouri
ethics commission that it has not knowingly or willfully
accepted funds, directly or indirectly, aggregating in
excess of ten thousand dollars from one or more prohibited
sources within the four-year period immediately preceding
the date the expenditure is made and that it will not do so
through the remainder of the calendar year in which the
ballot measure will appear on the ballot. Each disclosure
report filed pursuant to section 130.041 shall require the
entity making the expenditure to affirm that it has not
knowingly or willfully accepted funds, directly or
indirectly, aggregating in excess of ten thousand dollars
from one or more prohibited sources within the four-year
period immediately preceding the date the expenditure is
made. Receipt of an affirmation from a donor that it is not
a foreign national shall create a rebuttable presumption
that the entity has not knowingly or willingly accepted
funds, directly or indirectly, aggregating in excess of ten
thousand dollars from one or more prohibited sources.

SB 1133 3
Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit the attorney
general from pursuing any action pursuant to section 130.188
if the attorney general has found a willful violation of
this subsection.
4. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to
the contrary, a donor or entity that makes a contribution to
a committee or an expenditure in support of or in opposition
to a ballot measure from its own funds obtained through the
usual course of business or in any commercial or other
transaction from any source and which are not contributions
does not violate this section.
5. A committee shall not accept an in-kind
contribution from any foreign national or from any
individual or entity that has knowingly or willfully
accepted funds, directly or indirectly, aggregating in
excess of ten thousand dollars from one or more foreign
nationals within the four-year period immediately preceding
the date the in-kind contribution is made. A foreign
national shall not make an in-kind expenditure for the
purpose of supporting or opposing any ballot measure.
Section B. Because of the need to ensure that Missouri
elections are protected from undue foreign influence,
section A of this act is deemed necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public health, welfare, peace, and
safety, and is hereby declared to be an emergency act within
the meaning of the constitution, and section A of this act
shall be in full force and effect upon its passage and
approval.
✓